Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1206.02
County attorney, deputies, and employees; counties having a population of more than 200,000 inhabitants; private practice; illegal reference; malfeasance; penalty.

Any county attorney, deputy county attorney, or any employee of the county attorney in any county having a population of more than two hundred thousand inhabitants violating the provisions of section 23-1206.01 shall be guilty of malfeasance in office and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six months, or both such a fine and imprisonment, and in addition shall vacate his office.

Laws 1957, c. 72, § 2, p. 307.